Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 6. ROADWAYS

SUBTITLE G. TURNPIKES AND TOLL PROJECTS

CHAPTER 363. COUNTY TOLL BRIDGES

Sec. 363.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "contractor" includes a contractor's successor.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 363.002. CONTRACT FOR TOLL BRIDGE. (a) The commissioners court of a county may contract for the construction of a toll bridge over a large creek or watercourse if it is inexpedient for the county to build the bridge.

(b) The commissioners court shall determine the toll to be imposed for crossing the bridge.

(c) The commissioners court may grant to the contractor the right to the tolls for a period not to exceed 10 years.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 363.003. DUTY TO REPAIR; FORFEIT OF TOLLS. (a) The contractor shall maintain the bridge during the term of the contract.

(b) A contractor who fails to maintain the bridge forfeits all right to the tolls.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 363.004. SURETY BOND; ACTION ON BOND. (a) Before granting a license to a contractor to construct a toll bridge, the commissioners court shall require a bond in the amount of $1,000 with a good and sufficient surety. The bond shall be conditioned on:

(1) the construction of the bridge by the contractor; and

(2) the maintenance of the bridge by the contractor for the agreed term.

(b) A person who sustains damage because a contractor has not complied with the conditions of the bond may:

(1) sue the contractor on the bond; and

(2) recover any judgment for damages.

(c) A suit for damages under this section shall be brought in the county in which the license is granted.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 363.005. COUNTY TOLLS. The commissioners court of a county that issues bonds to construct a bridge may, under rules adopted by the commissioners court, impose tolls sufficient to:

(1) pay the interest on the bonds; or

(2) pay the interest and create a sinking fund for payment of the principal at maturity.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.